src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbDer-ONSET_И/І !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}г VerbEnd ; ! gerund (at the same time as the action)
!352 Pl
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Pl:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гъяс K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Pl+Ill:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гъясӧ K ; !345
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Pl+Ine:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гъясын K ; !OKK:50
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Pl+Ill+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гъясэ K ; !345
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Pl+Ill+PxSg1:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гъясам K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Pl+Ill+PxSg2:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гъясад K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Pl+Ill+PxSg3:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гъясас K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Pl+Ill+PxPl1:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гъясаным K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Pl+Ill+PxPl2:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гъясаныд K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Pl+Ill+PxPl3:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гъясаныс K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Pl+Ins:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гъясӧн K ;! 2000:359 
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Pl+Ins+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гъясэн K ;! 2000:359 
                                           !And Marina 2011-10-05 no Px
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ill:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гӧ K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ill+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}ге K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxSg1:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гам K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxSg2:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гад K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxSg3:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гас K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxPl1:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}ганым K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxPl2:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}ганыд K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxPl3:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}ганыс K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ill+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>ыге K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxSg1+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>ыгам K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxSg2+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>ыгад K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxSg3+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>ыгас K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxPl1+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>ыганым K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxPl2+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>ыганыд K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxPl3+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>ыганыс K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ins:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гӧн PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !Ӧнія коми кыв, 2000: 360
!351 Pl
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ins+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}ген PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !2018-0129
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgonMoz+Ger:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гӧн%>моз K ; !
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgonMoz+Ger+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}ген%>моз K ; !
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgMoz+Ger:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гмоз PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !371
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgSor+Ger:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гсор K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgSor+Ger+Ins:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гсорӧн K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgSor+Ger+Ins+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гсорен K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgTyr+Ger:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гтыр K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgTyrji+Ger:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гтырйи PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !374
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgTyrja+Ger:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гтыръя K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgChozh+Ger:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гчӧж PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !377
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgChozh+Ger+Ins:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гчӧжӧн K ; !

@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgChozh+Ger+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гчеж PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !377
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgChozh+Ger+Ins+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гчежен K ; !
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgKosti+Ger:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гкості PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !352, 379
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgKosta+Ger:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гкоста PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgKezhlo+Ger:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гкежлӧ K ; !393
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgKezhlo+Ger+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гкежлэ K ; !393

@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgKezhlo+Ger+PxSg2:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гкежлад K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgKezhlo+Ger+PxSg3:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гкежлас K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgKezhlo+Ger+PxPl1:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гкежланым K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgKezhlo+Ger+PxPl2:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гкежланыд K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgKezhlo+Ger+PxPl3:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>%{иі%}гкежланыс K ;


LEXICON VerbDer-ONSET_А !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
 VerbDer-ONSET_А/Я ;
LEXICON VerbDer-ONSET_А/Я !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Der+Der/Ана+Adv:%>%{ая%}на K ;
+Der+Der/Анаа+Adv:%>%{ая%}наа K ; !Adding after attestation in Komi Grammar 2000: 381
+Der+Der/Ан+Der/моз+Ger:%>%{ая%}нмоз PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !383

LEXICON VerbDer-ONSET_Я !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 VerbDer-ONSET_А/Я ;


LEXICON Verb-ynyDer
! verb-yny-to-verb
! The source stems have no stem vowel "ы", and therefore
! dervational suffixes come with an onset vowel

@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ышт+Dim:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ышт V_ШУНЫ ; !!кольмыштны
!+Der/ышт+Dim+V:%>ышт  VerbConj ;
!+V+Der/ышт+Dim+V+Inf:%>ыштны K ;
!+V+Der/ышт+Dim+V+ConNeg0@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@+Pl3@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@:%>ыштны@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@0@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ WordEnd ;
!+V+Der/ышт+Dim+V+ConNeg@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@:%>ышт0@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ WordEnd ;
!+V+Der/ышт+Dim+V+Imprt+Sg2:%>ышт WordEnd ;

@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ышт+Dim+Der/лы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ыштл V_ВОЛЫНЫ ;   !!??кольмыштлыны
!+V+Der/ышт+Dim+V+Der/лы+V:%>ыштл  VerbConj ;
!+V+Der/ышт+Dim+V+Der/лы+V+Inf:%>ыштлыны K ;
!+V+Der/ышт+Dim+V+Der/лы+V+ConNeg0@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@+Pl3@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@:%>ыштлыны@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@0@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ WordEnd ;
!+V+Der/ышт+Dim+V+Der/лы+V+ConNeg@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@:%>ыштл@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ WordEnd ;
!+V+Der/ышт+Dim+V+Der/лы+V+Imprt+Sg2:%>ыштл WordEnd ;

@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ышт+Dim+Der/лывлы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ыштлывл V_ВОЛЫНЫ ;  !!??кольмыштлывлыны

@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/л:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ыл V_ШУНЫ ;  !!тшӧктывны

@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/лывлы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ывл V_ВОЛЫНЫ ; !!тшӧктывлыны
!+V+Der/ывлы+V:%>ывл VerbConj ; ! мынтывл - мынтывлан
!+V+Der/ывлы+V+Inf:%>ывлыны K ;
!+V+Der/ывлы+V+ConNeg@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@+Pl3@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@:%>ывлыны@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@0@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ WordEnd ;
!+V+Der/ывлы+V+ConNeg0@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@:%>ывлы@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ WordEnd ;
!+V+Der/ывлы+V+Imprt+Sg2:%>ывлы WordEnd ;

@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/сьы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ысь V_ЛЫДДЬЫНЫ ; !! вевттьысьыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/сьы+Der/ышт+Dim:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ысьышт V_ШУНЫ ; !!лэптысьыштны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/сьы+Der/ышт+Der/лывлы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ысьыштлывл V_ВОЛЫНЫ ; !!?? вевттьысьыштлывлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/сьы+Der/ышт+Der/лы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ысьыштл V_ВОЛЫНЫ ; !!лэптысьыштлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/сьы+Der/л:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ысьл V_ВОЛЫНЫ ; !!кутчысьлыны

@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ал:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ал V_ШУНЫ ; !!бергӧдчавны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ал+Der/лы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@авл V_ВОЛЫНЫ ; !!бергӧдчавлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ал+Err/Dial+Der/лы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ал%^C2Vл V_ВОЛЫНЫ ; !!бергӧдчавлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ась:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ась V_ШУНЫ ; !! бертласьны


!<!-- This far 2012-01-19 -->

!+Der/овт@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:овт@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ V_ШУНЫ ; !!пановтны


! Stray verb forms :-о


LEXICON VerbDer-V
! Page 346 in the Komi grammar
+Der+Der/мысьт+Ger:%>мысьт K ; ! gerund (after the action) !353
+Der+Der/мысь+Ger:%>мысь K ; ! !353
+VTer:%>тӧдз PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !396
+Der+Der/мӧн+Ger:%>мӧн PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !399-403
+Der+Der/мӧнъя+Ger:%>мӧнъя WordEnd ; !399-403
+VAbess:%>тӧм PossessiveSuffixes ;
+VAbess+Der+Der/лун+N:%>тӧм%>лун N_ ;
+VCar:%>тӧг PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; ! 390
+Der+Car+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Ger:%>тӧгъя K ; !387
+Der+Car+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Ger:%>тӧга K ; !387
+Der+Car+Der/моз+Ger:%>тӧгмоз PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !
+Der+Der/Adv+Adv:%>ӧм%>выв ADV_ ; !2091-06-03
+Der+Der/Adv+Adv+Err/Dial:%>ӧм%>выл%^C2V ADV_ ; !2091-06-03
+Der+Der/Adv+Adv+Ela+PxSg2:%>ӧм%>выв%>сьыд ADV_ ; !2091-06-03
+Der+Der/Adv+Adv+Err/Dial+Ela+PxSg2:%>ӧм%>выл%^C2V%>сьыд ADV_ ; !2091-06-03

+Use/NG+Err/Dial+VTer:%>тэдз PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !396
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Der+Der/мӧн+Ger:%>мен PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !399-403
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Der+Der/мӧнъя+Ger:%>менъя WordEnd ; !399-403
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+VAbess:%>тэм PossessiveSuffixes ;
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+VCar:%>тэг PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; ! 390
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Der+Car+Err/Orth+Ger:%>тэгъя K ; !387
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Der+Car+Err/Orth+Ger:%>тэга K ; !387
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Der+Car+Der/моз+Ger:%>тэгмоз PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !



! 2012-02-11 This is a problem; олан-вӧлан, овны-вӧвны
!2018-10-21!LEXICON VerbPRT ! one verb, вӧвны 
!2018-10-21!+V: preterite ;
!2018-10-21!+V+ConNeg+Pl3@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@:%>ны@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!+V+ConNeg@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@:@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ WordEnd ;

LEXICON EM !!≈ * **@CODE@** эм:эм. Ending in -ӧсь.
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@+Ind+Prs+Sg3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@ WordEnd ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>ӧсь K ; ! Plural predicative ;
+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>эсь K ; ! Plural predicative ;

LEXICON EMYSHT ! эмышт "is a little / are a few"
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@+Ind+Prs+Sg3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@ WordEnd ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Ind+Prs+Pl3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ WordEnd ;
 
LEXICON GER ! 3 lexicalised +Ger forms.
+V+Ger: WordEnd ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
